South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S636.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 56-3-645 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 56-3-645.  (A) In addition to the registration fees imposed by this chapter, the owner of motor vehicles that are powered: (1) exclusively by electricity, hydrogen, or any fuel other than motor fuel, as defined in Section 12-28-110(39), that are not subject to motor fuel user fees imposed by Chapter 28, Title 12 shall pay a biennial road use fee of one hundred twenty two hundred dollars; and (2) by a combination of motor fuel subject to motor fuel user fees imposed by Chapter 28, Title 12 and electricity, hydrogen, or any fuel other than motor fuel that is not subject to motor fuel user fees imposed by Chapter 28, Title 12 shall pay a biennial road use fee of sixty one hundred dollars. (B) All of the fees collected pursuant to this section must be credited to the Infrastructure Maintenance Trust Fund. (C) The Department of Motor Vehicles shall collect this fee at the same time as the vehicle subject to the fee is titled or registered. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----